Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB90.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 160 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Lobby" has the same meaning as "lobbying services" in KRS 139.010 and
includes the attempt to influence any public referendum, primary, special
election, or regular election; and
(b) "Public school or school district" means a school district, public school,
public charter school, or public education cooperative of the
Commonwealth and includes all programs, departments, and offices of a
school district, public school, public charter school, or public educational
cooperative and any individual acting in an official capacity on behalf of a
school district, public charter school, public school, or public educational
cooperative;
(2) A public school or school district shall not, directly or indirectly, expend any
moneys appropriated by the General Assembly or any other moneys derived from
bequests, charges, deposits, donations, endowments, fees, grants, gifts, income,
receipts, tuition, or any other source to compensate an external individual or
entity to lobby.
(3) This section shall not be construed to restrict the ability of:
(a) A public school or school district employee to engage in lobbying services
within the course and scope of the employee's job description on behalf of
the public school or school district; or
(b) A public school or school district to compensate an external individual or
entity to represent the interests of the public school or school district before
the executive or legislative branch of the federal government.
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 1/6/2026 8:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1036
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 164 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "lobbying services" means the act of promoting or
securing passage of Kentucky legislation or an attempt to influence or sway a
state or local public official or other state or local public servant toward a desired
action, including but not limited to the support of or opposition to a project or the
passage, amendment, defeat, approval, or veto of any state or local legislation,
regulation, rule, or ordinance.
(2) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a public postsecondary education
institution shall not directly or indirectly, expend any moneys appropriated by the
General Assembly or any other moneys derived from bequests, charges, deposits,
donations, endowments, fees, grants, gifts, income, receipts, tuition, or any other
source to compensate an external individual or entity to engage in lobbying
services.
(3) This section shall not be construed to restrict the ability of:
(a) An employee of a public postsecondary education institution to engage in
lobbying services within the course and scope of the employee's job
description on behalf of the institution; or
(b) A public postsecondary education institution to compensate an external
individual or entity to represent the interests of the institution before the
executive or legislative branch of the federal government.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 1/6/2026 8:28 AM Jacketed